North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-09 Aid to Dependent Children
50-09-08.3.
Administrative enforcement in interstate cases.

In acting as the official agency of the state in administering the child support program under title IV-D, the state agency, directly or through agents and human service zones:

Shall use high-volume automated administrative enforcement, to the same extent as used in intrastate cases, in response to a request made by another state to enforce a child support order, and shall promptly report the results of such enforcement procedure to the requesting state;

May transmit requests, by electronic or other means, to other states for assistance in cases involving enforcement of child support orders which include information provided and intended to enable the receiving state to compare information about the case to information in the databases of the receiving state, and which constitute a certification:

Of the amount of arrearages, if any, under the child support order; and

That procedural due process requirements applicable to the case have been complied with;

In cases in which the state agency receives requests made by another state to enforce a child support order, shall not consider that matter a child support case transferred to this state, but may establish a corresponding case based on the other state’s request for assistance; and

Shall maintain records of:

The number of requests for assistance made by other states;

The number of cases in which this state collected support in response to requests made by other states; and

The amount of support collected.

For purposes of this section, the term “high-volume automated administrative enforcement” means, in interstate cases, on request of another state, the identification, by this state, through automated data matches with financial institutions and other entities where assets may be found, of assets owned by persons who owe child support in another state, and the seizure of such assets, by this state, through levy or other appropriate processes.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 61; 1999, ch. 141, § 23; 2007, ch. 148, § 14; 2019, ch. 391, § 103, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 14 of chapter 148, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-08.4.
Reporting arrearages to credit bureaus.

In acting as the official agency of the state in administering the child support program under title IV-D, the state agency, directly or through agents and human service zones, subject to subsection 2, may report periodically to consumer reporting agencies the name of any obligor who owes past-due support and the amount of past-due support owed by the obligor.

The state agency may report under subsection 1 only after such an obligor has been provided notice and a reasonable opportunity to contest the accuracy of the statement of the name and amount of overdue support owed by the obligor.

For purposes of this section, “consumer reporting agency” means an agency that has furnished evidence, satisfactory to the state agency, that the agency is a consumer reporting agency as defined in section 603(f) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act [15 U.S.C. 1681a(f)].

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 62; 2019, ch. 391, § 104, effective January 1, 2020.

50-09-08.5.
Securing assets to satisfy child support.

In acting as the official agency of the state in administering the child support program under title IV-D, in cases in which there is past-due child support, the state agency may secure assets to satisfy any current support obligation and the past-due amount by issuing writs of execution under chapter 28-21 or domestic relations orders that comply with federal law regarding pensions. Those writs of execution or domestic relations orders may be used to secure or seize property including:

Periodic or lump sum payments from:

An agency administering unemployment compensation benefits, workforce safety and insurance benefits, or other benefits; and

Judgments, settlements, and gaming proceeds otherwise belonging to the obligor, or payable upon the obligor’s demand;

Assets of the obligor held in financial institutions; and

Public and private retirement funds.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 63; 1999, ch. 141, § 24; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 415, § 15.

50-09-08.6.
Suspension of occupational, professional, recreational, motor vehicle operator, and vehicle licenses and registrations for nonpayment of child support or failure to obey subpoena.

As used in this section:

“License” means:

Any certificate, permit, or license issued by an agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state which the obligor is required to obtain prior to engaging in the obligor’s occupation or profession;

Any certificate, permit, or license issued by an agency of the state which the obligor is required to obtain prior to engaging in a recreational activity; and

Any operator’s license or vehicle license or registration which the obligor is required to obtain prior to operating or owning a vehicle in this state. As used in this section, “vehicle” includes any motor vehicle as defined in section 39-01-01, aircraft, snowmobile, motorboat, or personal watercraft.

“Licensee” means a person who has applied for or currently possesses a license.

“Licensing authority” means an agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state that issues a license, including occupational or professional boards, the game and fish department, and the department of transportation.

“Restrict”, as it relates to the operator’s license of an obligor or a person who fails to comply with a subpoena, includes the authority of the state agency to authorize the issuance, upon request for good cause, of a restricted operator’s license that is solely for the use of a motor vehicle during the licensee’s normal working hours.

The state agency, directly or through agents and child support agencies, may withhold, restrict, or suspend one or more licenses issued to:

A person who has failed, after receiving proper notice, to comply with a subpoena relating to a paternity or child support matter;

An obligor who is listed on the arrears registry; or

An obligor who is not in compliance with an existing payment plan that has been negotiated between the obligor and the state agency under this section or in exchange for the state agency refraining from taking an enforcement action against the obligor.

Before withholding, restricting, or suspending a license under subdivision a or b of subsection 2, the state agency shall send a notice to the licensee by first-class mail to the licensee’s last-known address stating that the licensee has thirty days after the date of the notice to comply with the subpoena, satisfy the arrearage in full, or negotiate a payment plan with the state agency under this section. The notice must further state that the licensee may contest the action of the state agency by making a written request for a court hearing under subsection 5 within ten days of the date of the notice.

Upon notice to the licensee, the state agency may withhold, restrict, or suspend a license under subdivision c of subsection 2 at any time if the licensee fails to comply with a payment plan negotiated under this section. A copy of the state agency’s order to withhold, restrict, or suspend a license must be sent to the licensee by first-class mail to the licensee’s last-known address. The order must state that the licensee may contest the action of the state agency by making a written request for a court hearing under subsection 5 within ten days of the date of the order.

A request for a hearing under this section must be made to the court that issued or considered the child support order. If a child support order was issued by a court or administrative tribunal in another jurisdiction, the request may be made to any court of this state which has jurisdiction to enforce that order or, if no court of this state has jurisdiction to enforce that order, in any court of this state with jurisdiction over the licensee.

In a contest under this section, the court shall affirm the action of the state agency to withhold, restrict, or suspend a license unless the court finds that the state agency’s decision was arbitrary, unreasonable, or capricious.

The state agency shall notify the appropriate licensing authority that the state agency has withheld, restricted, or suspended a license under this section. A license that is withheld, restricted, or suspended by the state agency under this section may be reinstated only by the state agency after the licensee complies with the subpoena, satisfies the arrearage in full, or enters into a payment plan with the state agency under this section.

An obligor and the state agency may enter into a payment plan under which the obligor agrees to satisfy the obligor’s total child support obligation, including arrears, within a period not to exceed ten years. A payment plan under this section must require the obligor to make an immediate payment to the state disbursement unit in an amount equal to five percent of the total arrears owed by the obligor or five hundred dollars, whichever is greater. The state agency may waive or reduce the immediate payment that is due under a payment plan if the obligor’s current or most recent monthly support obligation is less than five hundred dollars. The state agency may require that a payment plan under this section include satisfaction of all court-ordered child support obligations of the obligor. The obligor’s current or most recent monthly support obligation under section 14-09-09.30 must be considered when determining the duration of a payment plan under this section and the payments due under the agreement. A payment plan under this section is not a modification of any child support obligation of the obligor and does not bar judicial review of a child support order under section 14-09-08.4 or other enforcement actions by the obligee or the state agency.

An action of the state agency to withhold, restrict, or suspend a license under this section may not be appealed to the state agency or to the licensing authority, including an appeal under chapter 28-32. Section 50-09-14 does not apply to actions taken by the state agency under this section.

Except for statistical purposes, an entry on the driving record or abstract of a restriction or suspension under this section after the restriction or suspension ceases may not be available to the public other than by order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

A licensing authority and any person acting on its behalf is not liable for any actions taken to withhold, restrict, or suspend a license under this section. This section does not limit the ability of a licensing authority to withhold, restrict, or suspend a license on any other grounds authorized by law.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 124, § 6; 2005, ch. 122, § 3; 2005, ch. 415, § 17; 2007, ch. 148, § 15; 2009, ch. 420, § 1; 2019, ch. 127, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 420, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 15 of chapter 148, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

Collateral References.

Validity, Construction, and Application of State Statutes Providing for Revocation of Driver’s License for Failure to Pay Child Support, 30 A.L.R.6th 483.

50-09-09.
Award of assistance.

Upon completion of the investigation of an applicant for assistance under this chapter, the human service zone or state agency shall determine, in accordance with the rules of the state agency:

If the applicant may be provided assistance under the provisions of this chapter;

The amount and type of any assistance the applicant may receive; and

The date upon which such assistance may begin.

In all cases, a statement of the findings of the human service zone forthwith must be transmitted to the state agency.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 9; 1941, ch. 243, § 9; 1943, ch. 221, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 50-0909; S.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 5; 1997, ch. 404, § 64; 2019, ch. 391, § 105, effective January 1, 2020.

50-09-10.
Amount of assistance — Consideration of stepfather’s income. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 9.

50-09-10.1.
State agency authorized to make seasonal adjustments to payment levels. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 9.

50-09-11.
Redetermination of awards. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 9.

50-09-12.
Records — State agency to make rules governing — Use of by other agencies limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 9.

50-09-13.
Disclosure of information contained in records — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1977, ch. 451, § 2.

Note.

For present provisions, see § 50-06-15.

50-09-14.
Appeal and hearing — Review of child support actions.

An applicant for or recipient of temporary assistance for needy families under this chapter, aggrieved because of a human service zone’s or state agency’s decision or delay in making a decision, may appeal to the state agency in the manner prescribed by the state agency and must be afforded a reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the state agency. The state agency, on its own motion, may review individual cases and make determinations which are binding upon the human service zone. An applicant or recipient aggrieved by any such determination, upon request, must be afforded reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the state agency. All decisions of the state agency made on an appeal are final and are binding upon and must be complied with by the human service zone.

Any person aggrieved by an action taken by the state agency or a child support agency under section 14-09-25, chapter 35-34, this chapter, or by the North Dakota lottery director under chapter 53-12.1 to establish or enforce a child support order may seek review of the action in the court of this state which issued or considered the child support order. If an order for child support was issued by a court or administrative tribunal in another jurisdiction, any person aggrieved by an action taken by the state agency or a child support agency under section 14-09-25, chapter 35-34, this chapter, or by the North Dakota lottery director under chapter 53-12.1 to enforce that order may seek review of the action in any court of this state which has jurisdiction to enforce that order, or if no court of this state has jurisdiction to enforce that order, in any court of this state with jurisdiction over the necessary parties. Any review sought under this subsection must be commenced within thirty days after the date of action for which review is sought. A person who has a right of review under this subsection may not seek review of the actions in a proceeding under chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, §§ 9, 10; 1941, ch. 243, § 12; R.C. 1943, § 50-0914; S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 65; 2001, ch. 152, § 9; 2003, ch. 454, § 2; 2005, ch. 470, § 3; 2009, ch. 419, § 13; 2019, ch. 391, § 106, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 419, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

50-09-15.
Assistance for dependent children not assignable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 386, § 2.

50-09-15.1.
Child support improvement account — Continuing appropriation.

The child support improvement account is established as a special account in the state treasury. Five percent of the total amount of child support incentive payments paid to the state by the office of child support enforcement of the United States department of health and human services must be deposited into the child support improvement account. The funds in the child support improvement account, the balance of the child support incentives account on July 1, 2005, and any matching federal funds received by the state agency are appropriated on a continuing basis for the sole purpose of producing increases in child support collections, federal child support incentives, or other revenue or savings to the state agency, or reductions in unpaid child support, that exceed the total amount of improvement funds expended. Improvement funds may be used to sponsor training and publications that promote child support enforcement activities. The state agency shall develop and maintain a business plan that defines the goals and objectives of the child support enforcement program, identifies methods to increase child support collections or reduce unpaid child support, and outlines the process for evaluating progress toward the goals and objectives in the business plan. The state agency must maintain a record of its use of improvement funds and the anticipated result from the use of the funds. Improvement funds may only be used for activities that are included in the business plan maintained under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 478, § 1; 2005, ch. 416, § 3.

50-09-16.
Aid to dependent children fund — Receipts for moneys received. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13 and S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 78.

50-09-17.
Disbursements of aid to dependent children fund — How made — Payment of aid and expenses of state agency. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13 and S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 78.

50-09-18.
Persons handling money of fund bonded. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13.

50-09-19.
Care of child in boarding home or child-placing agency — How paid. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 9.

50-09-20.
Appropriation of county funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13 and by S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 79.

50-09-20.1.
Amounts state liable for — Reimbursement by state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13 and S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 79.

50-09-20.2.
Amount state liable for — Prepayment by state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13.

50-09-21.
Amount county liable for — Reimbursement by county. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13 and S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 79.

50-09-21.1.
County share of foster care costs. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 34, § 10; repealed by 2015, ch. 329, § 11, effective January 1, 2016.

50-09-22.
Procedure for reimbursement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 403, § 13 and S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 79.

50-09-23.
Fraudulent acts — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

50-09-24.
Limitations of chapter.

All assistance awarded under this chapter must be deemed to be awarded and to be held subject to the provisions of any amending or repealing act which may be passed, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, because that recipient’s assistance has been affected in any way by any amending or repealing act. Assistance provided under this chapter is not an entitlement. No person has a property interest in any assistance sought or provided under this chapter. This chapter may not be construed to require provision of assistance not required by federal law.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 20; 1941, ch. 243, § 20; R.C. 1943, § 50-0924; 1997, ch. 404, § 72.

50-09-25.
Authority to adopt rules.

The state agency may adopt rules reasonable or necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 7.

50-09-26.
Transition to training, education, employment, and management program. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 418, § 6.

50-09-27.
Programs funded at state expense — Interpretation.

The state shall bear the cost, in excess of the amount provided by the federal government, of:

Services provided under this chapter as child care assistance;

Services provided under this chapter as employment and training programs;

Temporary assistance for needy families benefits provided under this chapter; and

Foster care and subsidized adoption costs under this chapter.

This section does not grant any recipient of services, benefits, or supplements identified in subsection 1, any service, benefit, or supplement that a recipient could not claim in the absence of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 74; 2015, ch. 329, § 7, effective January 1, 2016.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 329, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2015.

50-09-28.
Substitution of terms — Meaning of title IV-A.

Whenever the term “aid to families with dependent children”, or any derivative of that term, appears in this code or the North Dakota Administrative Code, used in a context that refers to a period following the effective date of a state plan submitted under section 402 of the Social Security Act, as added by title I of Pub. L. 104-193; 110 Stat. 2110, the term “temporary assistance for needy families”, or a derivative of that term, must be substituted therefor. The term “title IV-A of the Social Security Act”, or any derivative of that term, whenever it appears in this code or the North Dakota Administrative Code, used in a context that refers to a period following the effective date of a state plan submitted under section 402 of the Social Security Act, as added by title I of Pub. L. 104-193; 110 Stat. 2110, refers to title IV-A of the Social Security Act, as amended by section 103 of Pub. L. 104-193; 110 Stat. 2112 et seq.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 75.

50-09-29.
Requirements for administration of temporary assistance for needy families.

Except as provided in subsections 2, 3, and 4, the state agency, in its administration of the temporary assistance for needy families program, shall:

Provide assistance to otherwise eligible women in the third trimester of a pregnancy;

Except as provided in subdivision c, afford eligible households benefits for no more than sixty months;

Exempt eligible households from the requirements of subdivision b due to mental or physical disability of a parent or child, mental or physical incapacity of a parent, or other hardship including a parent subject to domestic violence as defined in section 14-07.1-01;

Unless an exemption, exclusion, or disregard is required by law, count income and assets whenever actually available;

Except as provided in subdivision j, and as required to allow the state to receive funds from the federal government under title IV-A, provide no benefits to noncitizen immigrants who arrive in the United States after August 21, 1996;

Limit eligibility to households with total available assets, not otherwise exempted or excluded, of a value established by the state agency;

Exclude one motor vehicle of any value in determining eligibility;

Require work activities for all household members not specifically exempted by the state agency for reasons such as mental or physical disability of a parent or child or mental or physical incapacity of a parent;

Establish goals and take action to prevent and reduce the incidence of out-of-wedlock pregnancies and establish numerical goals for reducing the illegitimacy rate for the state for periods through calendar year 2005;

To the extent required to allow the state to receive funds from the federal government under title IV-A, provide benefits to otherwise eligible noncitizens who are lawfully present in the United States;

Establish and enforce standards against program fraud and abuse;

Provide employment placement programs;

Exempt from assets and income the savings and proportionate matching funds in individual development accounts;

Determine the unemployment rate of adults living in a county that includes Indian reservation lands and a significant population of Indian individuals by using unemployment data provided by job service North Dakota;

When appropriate, require household members to complete high school;

To the extent required to allow the state to receive funds from the federal government under title IV-A, exempt single parents from required work activities;

Provide for sanctions, including termination of assistance to the household, if a household member fails to cooperate with work requirements;

Provide for sanctions, including termination of assistance to the household, if a household member fails, without good cause, to cooperate with child support activities;

Deny assistance with respect to a minor child absent from the household for more than one calendar month, except as specifically provided by the state agency for absences;

Require each household to participate in developing an individual employment plan and provide for sanctions, including termination of assistance to the household, if adult or minor household members age sixteen or older fail to cooperate with the terms of the individual employment plan;

Provide pre-pregnancy family planning services that are to be incorporated into the temporary assistance for needy families program assessment;

Except in cases of pregnancy resulting from rape or incest, not increase the assistance amount to recognize the increase in household size when a child is born to a household member who was a recipient of assistance under this chapter during the probable month of the child’s conception;

Disregard earned income as an incentive allowance for no more than twelve months; and

Consider, and if determined appropriate, authorize demonstration projects in defined areas which may provide benefits and services that are not identical to benefits and services provided elsewhere.

If the secretary of the United States department of health and human services determines that funds otherwise available for the temporary assistance for needy families program in this state must be reduced or eliminated should the state agency administer the program in accordance with any provision of subsection 1, the state agency shall administer the program in a manner that avoids the reduction or loss.

If the state agency determines, subject to the approval of the legislative management, that there is insufficient worker opportunity, due to increases in the unemployment rate, to participate in work activities, the state agency may administer the temporary assistance for needy families program in a manner different than provided in subsection 1.

If the state agency determines, subject to the approval of the legislative management, that administration of the temporary assistance for needy families program, in the manner provided by subsection 1, causes otherwise eligible individuals to become a charge upon the human service zones under chapter 50-01, the state agency may administer the program in a manner that avoids that result.

The state agency may not deny assistance to any individual who has been convicted of a felony offense that has as an element the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance as defined in section 102(6) of the Controlled Substance Act [21 U.S.C. 802(6)].

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 76; 1999, ch. 421, § 2; 2001, ch. 418, § 4; 2003, ch. 411, § 3; 2009, ch. 482, § 35; 2009, ch. 522, § 1; 2013, ch. 367, § 6; 2015, ch. 335, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 108, § 17, effective April 21, 2017; 2019, ch. 391, § 107, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 335, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 367, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 35 of chapter 482, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 522, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2009.

50-09-30.
Child support agencies exempt from certain fees.

The recorder and secretary of state may not charge or collect any fee otherwise prescribed by law from a state or human service zone engaged in the establishment of paternity or the establishment, modification, or enforcement of child support orders.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 152, § 7; 2019, ch. 391, § 108, effective January 1, 2020.

50-09-31.
Victims of domestic violence — Duties of state agency.

The state agency shall:

Inform all temporary assistance for needy families applicants and recipients of the options available under the domestic violence option;

Screen all applicants to determine who are past or present victims of domestic violence or at risk of further domestic violence;

Refer these individuals to a local domestic violence sexual assault organization for safety planning and supportive services; and

Determine if good cause exists to waive work requirements or time limits on receipt of benefits for victims of domestic violence.

For purposes of this section:

“Domestic violence option” means the provision of title IV-A under which a state may elect to implement a special program to serve victims of domestic violence.

“Domestic violence sexual assault organization” has the meaning provided in section 14-07.1-01.

“Victims of domestic violence” means a person subject to domestic violence as defined in section 14-07.1-01.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 418, § 5.

50-09-32.
Disclosure of identity of child support obligors.

To the extent permitted by federal law, the state agency may disclose information to the public about a parent whose location is unknown or about an obligor who is listed on the arrears registry and owes past-due child support in an amount greater than ten thousand dollars, including the person’s name, last-known address, date of birth, occupation, photograph, amount of child support owed, the number and ages of the children for whom support is owed, and any other information that would assist in locating the person.

Prior to disclosing information about an obligor under this section, the state agency shall send to each obligor whose name will be released a notice by regular mail to the obligor’s last-known address. The notice must contain the information the state agency plans to release and give the obligor thirty days to object to the accuracy of the information. The notice must state that the obligor may avoid public disclosure of the information under this section if the obligor provides the state agency with the obligor’s current address and employer and makes a child support payment in an amount equal to the amount of child support the obligor is required to pay each month under section 14-09-09.30. Information regarding an obligor who owes any past-due support may be disclosed if at any time after receiving a notice under this subsection the obligor fails to make a required child support payment in an amount determined under section 14-09-09.30.

The state agency shall obtain the written consent of the obligee before disclosing information regarding an obligor under subsection 1.

The state agency must develop and maintain a list of the names, addresses, and amounts of past-due support owed by obligors who have been found in contempt of court in this state for failure to comply with a child support order or who have been found guilty of willful failure to pay child support under section 12.1-37-01. Notwithstanding subsections 2 and 3, to the extent permitted by federal law, the state agency must release the list upon request under section 44-04-18. The state agency may remove from the list any obligor who no longer owes past-due support, any obligor who is deceased or whose obligation is being enforced in another jurisdiction, or any obligor whose conviction under section 12.1-37-01 has been sealed.

The state agency, its employees and agents, and any person publishing information that is disclosed under this section is immune from any civil or criminal liability resulting from the disclosure of information under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 413, § 1; 2005, ch. 415, § 20; 2007, ch. 148, § 16; 2019, ch. 103, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 16 of chapter 148, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-33.
Continuing appropriation — Cooperative agreements for child support enforcement services.

All federal funds and other income generated by the state agency under a cooperative agreement with an Indian tribe for child support enforcement services are appropriated on a continuing basis for the sole purpose of hiring additional staff and payment of other expenses as necessary to carry out the state agency’s duties under the agreements.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 125, § 12; 2005, ch. 415, § 21; 2007, ch. 417, § 10.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 10 of chapter 417, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-34.
Administration of child support enforcement activities. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 417, § 15.

50-09-35.
Child support deduction order.

The state agency, directly or through agents, may issue an order requiring an income payer to deduct the amount identified in the order from the portion of any lump sum payment to an obligor that has been withheld under section 14-09-09.34.

The state agency, directly or through agents, may issue an order requiring a financial institution to deduct the amount identified in the order from any account of the obligor maintained in the financial institution.

The state agency shall serve the order on the income payer or financial institution in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action or in any other manner agreed to by the income payer or financial institution. The state agency shall serve a copy of the order upon the obligor by first-class mail to the obligor’s last-known address, along with a notice of the obligor’s right to claim that the property is exempt from legal process under section 28-22-02, the right to request an informal review by the state agency within ten days of the date of the notice, and the right of the obligor and any other aggrieved person to a review by a court under section 50-09-14. If an informal review is requested under this subsection, the time for requesting a review by a court under section 50-09-14 does not expire until thirty days after the informal review is completed.

The income payer or financial institution shall deduct the amount identified in the order or the balance of the account, whichever is less, and transmit the funds to the state disbursement unit within seven business days of the date the order is served.

An order issued under this section has priority over any other legal process against the same account, except to the extent necessary to satisfy any right of setoff which exists in connection with an account, payment orders that were made by the obligor before the financial institution was served with the order, or other obligations of the obligor based upon written agreements or instruments made or issued by the obligor before the financial institution was served with the order.

An income payer or financial institution may also withhold and retain an additional sum of three dollars from the obligor’s account or from the amount retained under section 14-09-09.34 to cover expenses involved in transmitting payment.

An income payer or financial institution receiving an order under this section is subject to the same duties and liabilities as an income payer under section 14-09-09.3 unless the context indicates otherwise and is immune from suit or liability for complying with an order under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 415, § 18.

50-09-36.
Protest period.

Except as authorized by the obligor, the state agency shall hold any funds collected under section 28-21-05.2, 50-09-35, or 50-09-40 and may not disburse the funds as a collection of child support until the time has expired for requesting a review by a court under section 50-09-14 or the conclusion of the review, whichever is later. Interest does not accrue under section 28-20-34 after the funds are received by the state agency.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 415, § 19; 2009, ch. 419, § 14.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 14 of chapter 419, S.L. 2009 became effective July 1, 2010.

50-09-37.
Health insurance data match.

An insurer as defined in section 26.1-36.5-01 shall exchange health insurance information with the state agency for the purpose of establishing or enforcing a medical support obligation. An insurer shall provide the health insurance information required in this section to the state agency or its agent not more frequently than twelve times in a year. The insurer shall provide the information required in this section at no cost if the information is in a readily available structure or format. If the state agency requests the information in a structure or format that is not readily available, the insurer may charge a reasonable fee for providing the information, not to exceed the actual cost of providing the information. The state agency and its agents may not use or disclose any information provided by the insurer under this section except to establish or enforce a child support or medical support obligation, or as otherwise permitted or required by law. An insurer may not be held liable for the release of health insurance information to the state agency or its agents under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 148, § 17.

Effective Date.

This section became effective April 11, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 18 of chapter 148, S.L. 2007.

50-09-38.
Transition assistance for child care.

The state agency shall establish a program of transition assistance to pay a portion of the cost of child care for families that lose eligibility, and remain ineligible, for benefits under section 50-09-29 due to earnings from employment. This program must:

Provide benefits for up to the six months following the loss of benefits under section 50-09-29;

Pay assistance to the child care provider; and

Meet all requirements to be considered “assistance” for purposes of title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, part 260, section 31, or any substantially similar federal regulation that may replace title 45, Code of Federal Regulations, part 260, section 31.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 418, § 1; 2011, ch. 356, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 356, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

This section became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-39.
Employment of special assistant attorneys general.

The state agency may employ attorneys to carry out its duties in administering the child support enforcement and medical support enforcement programs. Any attorney who represents the state agency under this chapter must be a special assistant attorney general appointed by the attorney general under section 54-12-08. The salary and expenses of each special assistant attorney general must be paid by the state agency. An appointment under this section is revocable at the pleasure of the attorney general.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 417, § 11.

Effective Date.

This section became effective July 1, 2007.